Wyoming statutes. Title 36 State Lands
Article 7. Sinks Canyon

§ 36-8-701.
Declaration of Sinks Canyon state park; disposal of land.

The lands in Fremont County managed by the department as of July 1, 2010 and known as Sinks Canyon are hereby declared to be a state park. The department shall by rule specify the legal description of the state park.

These lands shall not be sold, leased or otherwise disposed of by any state agency without the approval of the legislature.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 4, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 36-180.18; Laws 1978, ch. 34, § 1; 2010, ch. 11, § 2.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, in (a) deleted “state owned” preceding “lands,” inserted “managed by the department as of July 1, 2010 and,” deleted “described as follows” following “Sinks Canyon,” deleted the statutory legal descriptions following “state park,” and added the last sentence.

§ 36-8-702.
Administration.

The department of state parks and cultural resources and the Wyoming game and fish commission shall jointly administer this area.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 4, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 36-180.19; Laws 1990, ch. 44, § 2; 1999, ch. 69, § 2.